Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. Definitions.

§ 23.1-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Associate-degree-granting”
means that an associate degree is the most advanced degree that is granted.

“Associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education”
includes Richard Bland College and each comprehensive community college.

“Baccalaureate”
means that bachelor’s degrees or more advanced degrees, or both, are granted.

“Baccalaureate public institution of higher education”
includes Christopher Newport University, George Mason University, James Madison University, Longwood University, the University of Mary Washington, Norfolk State University, Old Dominion University, Radford University, the University of Virginia, the University of Virginia’s College at Wise as a division of the University of Virginia, Virginia Commonwealth University, Virginia Military Institute, Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, Virginia State University, and The College of William and Mary in Virginia.

“Chief executive officer”
includes the Chancellor of the Virginia Community College System, the Chancellor of the University of Virginia’s College at Wise, the Superintendent of Virginia Military Institute, and the president of each other public institution of higher education.

“Comprehensive community college”
means an associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education governed by the State Board that offers instruction in one or more of the following fields:

Freshman and sophomore courses in arts and sciences acceptable for transfer to baccalaureate degree programs;

Diversified technical curricula, including programs leading to an associate degree;

Career and technical education leading directly to employment;

Courses in general and continuing education for adults in the fields set out in subdivisions 1, 2, and 3; or

Noncredit training and retraining courses and programs of varying lengths to meet the needs of business and industry in the Commonwealth.“Council” means the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia.“Governing board” includes the State Board and the board of visitors of each baccalaureate public institution of higher education. “Governing board” does not include local community college boards.“Local community college board” means the board established to act in an advisory capacity to the State Board and perform such duties with respect to the operation of a single comprehensive community college as may be delegated to it by the State Board.“Nonprofit private institution of higher education” means any postsecondary school, as that term is defined in §

23.1-213

, in the Commonwealth that is exempt from paying federal income taxes under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is certified by the Council to offer degrees or exempt from such certification pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-213

et seq.) of Chapter 2.“Non-Virginia student” means any student who has not established domicile in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

23.1-502

.“Private institution of higher education” includes each nonprofit private institution of higher education and proprietary private institution of higher education in the Commonwealth.“Proprietary private institution of higher education” means any postsecondary school, as that term is defined in § 23.1-213, in the Commonwealth that is privately owned, privately managed, and obligated to pay federal income taxes in the Commonwealth and is certified by the Council to offer degrees or exempt from such certification pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-213

et seq.) of Chapter 2.“Public institution of higher education” includes the System as a whole and each associate-degree-granting and baccalaureate public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth.“State Board” means the State Board for Community Colleges.“System” means the Virginia Community College System.“Virginia student” means any student who has established domicile in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

23.1-502

.

History.

2016, c. 588.

Transition provisions.

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions of
§

2.2-108

, Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, or Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, or Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2016, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 23.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section, article, or chapter is given a new number in Title 23.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia, all references to
§

2.2-108

, Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, or Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, or Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia or any other title of the Code of Virginia shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article, or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of
§

2.2-108

, Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, or Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, or Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of
§ 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2016 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 5 provides: “That the amendment of
§

2.2-108

and the repeal of Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, and Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, and Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia, Chapter 471 of the Acts of Assembly of 1964, as amended, Chapter 170 of the Acts of Assembly of 1978, and Chapter 306 of the Acts of Assembly of 1986, as amended, effective as of October 1, 2016, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the amendment of
§

2.2-108

, the repeal of Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, and Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, and Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia, Chapter 471 of the Acts of Assembly of 1964, as amended, Chapter 170 of the Acts of Assembly of 1978, and Chapter 306 of the Acts of Assembly of 1986, as amended, and the enactment of Title 23.1 shall not apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2016, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2016, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2016, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 23.1 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 7 provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, subsection, or section of Title 23.1 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, subsection, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 23.1 are declared severable.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 8 provides: “That the amendment of
§

2.2-108

and the repeal of Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, and Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, and Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia, Chapter 471 of the Acts of Assembly of 1964, as amended, Chapter 170 of the Acts of Assembly of 1978, and Chapter 306 of the Acts of Assembly of 1986, as amended, effective as of October 1, 2016, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement, management agreement, memorandum of understanding, prepaid tuition contract, savings trust agreement, or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement, management agreement, memorandum of understanding, prepaid tuition contract, savings trust agreement, or other contract, that existed prior to such amendment or repeal.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 9 provides: “That the amendment of
§

2.2-108

and the repeal of Article 4 ( §

2.2-2508

et seq.) of Chapter 25, Article 1 ( §

2.2-2700

et seq.) of Chapter 27, and Chapter 50.1 ( §

2.2-5004

et seq.) of Title 2.2,
§ 3.2-503, and Title 23 ( §

23-1

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia, Chapter 471 of the Acts of Assembly of 1964, as amended, Chapter 170 of the Acts of Assembly of 1978, and Chapter 306 of the Acts of Assembly of 1986, as amended, effective as of October 1, 2016, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such amendment or repeal.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 11 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after October 1, 2016, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 12 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2016.”